District of Columbia statutes.
1-207.04

Acceptance or nonacceptance of Charter.

(a)

If a majority of the registered qualified electors voting in the charter referendum vote for the charter, the charter shall be considered accepted as of the time the Board of Elections certifies the result of the charter referendum to the President of the United States, as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

(b)

The Board of Elections shall, within a reasonable time, but in no event more than thirty days after the date of the charter referendum, certify the result of the charter referendum to the President of the United States and to the Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Representatives.

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 779, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 704
On May 17, 1974, the District of Columbia Board of Elections certified the results of the election of May 7, 1974, where a majority of the registered qualified voters of the District, voting on the issues of the establishment of the District Charter (subchapter IV of Chapter 2 of Title 1) and the establishment of Advisory Neighborhood Councils, voted in favor of both issues. See 21 DCR 651.